src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/verbTVaeaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/gehålator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/gehålator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Normal even-syllable -a, -å and -e transitive verbs . Lexicon BASSAT_TV, LÁHPPET_TV, JUHKAT_TV, JIEHKET_TV, DIEHTET_TV, MÁHTTET_TV

Tests:
  Verb - bårråt: # BASSAT
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Inf: bårråt
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Sup: båråtjit
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ger: bårådijn
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+PrfPrc: bårråm
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+PrsPrc: bårre
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Actio+Ess: bårråmin
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Actio+Ela: bårråmis
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+VAbess: båråk
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båråv
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: bårå
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: bårrå
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: bårrin
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: bårråbihtte
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: bårråba
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: bårråp
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: bårråbihtit
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: bårri
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: bårriv
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: bårri
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: båråj
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: båråjma
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: båråjda
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: båråjga
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: båråjma
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: båråjda
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: bårrin
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Sg1: []
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: bårå
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: bårris
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: bårron
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: bårre
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: bårriska
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: bårrop
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: bårrit
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: bårrisa
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg1: []
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg2: bårru
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Sg3: bårrus
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Du1: bårrun
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Du2: bårruda
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Du3: bårruska
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: bårrup
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: bårrut
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: bårrusa
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: båråtjav
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: båråtja
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: båråsj
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Du1: båråtjin
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Du2: båråtjihppe
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Du3: båråtjibá
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: båråtjip
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: båråtjihpit
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: båråtji
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båråduváv
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bårruv
    bårråt+Hom1+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: bårådaláv
    bårråt+Hom1+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: bårålulu
    
Tests:
  Verb - gåhpåt: # BASSAT
    gåhpåt+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: gåhppe
    
Tests:
  Verb - mållåt: # BASSAT
    mållåt+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: målle
    
Tests:
  Verb - råhkåt: # BASSAT  
    råhkåt+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: råhkke

Tests:
  Verb - nåhkåt: # RAVGGAT
    nåhkåt+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: nåhkke

  Verb - hållat: # BASSAT_TV
    hållat+V+TV+Inf: hållat
    hållat+V+TV+Sup: hålatjit
    hållat+V+TV+Ger: håladijn
    hållat+V+TV+PrfPrc: hållam
    hållat+V+TV+PrsPrc: hoalle
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: hållamin
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: hållamis
    hållat+V+TV+VAbess: hålak
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hålav
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoallá
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: hållin
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: hållabihtte
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: hållaba
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hållap
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hållabihtit
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hålliv
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hålaj
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: hålajma
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: hålajda
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hålajga
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hålajma
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: hålajda
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: hållin
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: hållis
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: hållon
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: hoalle
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: hålliska
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: hållup
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: hållut
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: hållusa
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: hålatjav
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: hålatja
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: hålasj
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: hålatji
    hållat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: håladuváv
    hållat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hoalluv
    hållat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: håladaláv
    hållat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: hålalulu
    hållat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: hålalulujma

  Verb - nerrat: # BASSAT_TV
    nerrat+V+TV+Inf: nerrat
    nerrat+V+TV+Sup: neratjit
    nerrat+V+TV+Ger: neradijn
    nerrat+V+TV+PrfPrc: nerram
    nerrat+V+TV+PrsPrc: [nærre, närre]
    nerrat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: nerramin
    nerrat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: nerramis
    nerrat+V+TV+VAbess: nerak
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nerav
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nera
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [nærrá, närrá]
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: nerrin
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: nerrabihtte
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: nerraba
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nerrap
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: nerrabihtit
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nerri
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: nerriv
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: nerri
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: neraj
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: nerajma
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: nerajda
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: nerajga
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: nerajma
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: nerajda
    nerrat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nerrin
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: nera
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: nerris
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: [närron, nærron]
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [nærre, närre]
    nerrat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: nerriska
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: nerrup
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: nerrut
    nerrat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: nerrusa
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: neratjav
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: neratja
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: nerasj
    nerrat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: neratji
    nerrat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: neraduváv
    nerrat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: neradaláv
    nerrat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nerruv
    nerrat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: neralulu
    nerrat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: neralulujma

  Verb - gæhttjat: # BASSAT_TV
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Inf: [gæhttjat, gähttjat]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Sup: gehtjatjit
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ger: gehtjadijn
    gæhttjat+V+TV+PrfPrc: [gæhttjam, gähttjam]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+PrsPrc: [gæhttje, gähttje]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: [gæhttjamin, gähttjamin]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: [gæhttjamis, gähttjamis]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+VAbess: gehtjak
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gehtjav
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gehtja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [gæhttjá, gähttjá]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: [gæhttjin, gähttjin]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [gæhttjabihtte, gähttjabihtte]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: [gæhttjaba, gähttjaba]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [gæhttjap, gähttjap]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [gæhttjabihtit, gähttjabihtit]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [gæhttji, gähttji]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [gæhttjiv, gähttjiv]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [gæhttji, gähttji]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gehtjaj
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gehtjajma
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gehtjajda
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gehtjajga
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: gehtjajma
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: gehtjajda
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [gæhttjin, gähttjin]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: gehtja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: [gæhttjis, gähttjis]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: [gæhttjon, gähttjon]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [gæhttje, gähttje]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: [gæhttjiska, gähttjiska]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: [gæhttjup, gähttjup]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: [gæhttjut, gähttjut]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: [gæhttjusa, gähttjusa]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: gehtjatjav
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: gehtjatja
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: gehtjasj
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: gehtjatji
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gehtjaduváv
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [gæhttjuv, gähttjuv]
    gæhttjat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gehtjadaláv
    gæhttjat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: gehtjalulu
    gæhttjat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: gehtjalulujma

  Verb - rahpat: # BASSAT_TV
    rahpat+V+TV+Inf: rahpat
    rahpat+V+TV+Sup: rabátjit
    rahpat+V+TV+Ger: rabádijn
    rahpat+V+TV+PrfPrc: rahpam
    rahpat+V+TV+PrsPrc: rahppe
    rahpat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: rahpamin
    rahpat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: rahpamis
    rahpat+V+TV+VAbess: rabák
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabáv
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rabá
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rahpabihtit
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rahpi
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rahpiv
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rahpi
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rabáj
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: rabájma
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: rabájda
    rahpat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rabájga
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: rabá
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: rahpis
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: rahpon
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: rahppe
    rahpat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: rahpiska
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: rahpup
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: rahput
    rahpat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: rahpusa
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: rabátjav
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: rabátja
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: rabásj
    rahpat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: rabátji
    rahpat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabáduváv
    rahpat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rahppuv
    rahpat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabádaláv
    rahpat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: rabálulu
    rahpat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: rabálulujma

  Verb - roaddat: # BASSAT_TV
    roaddat+V+TV+Inf: roaddat
    roaddat+V+TV+Sup: råttatjit
    roaddat+V+TV+Ger: råttadijn
    roaddat+V+TV+PrfPrc: roaddam
    roaddat+V+TV+PrsPrc: roadde
    roaddat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: roaddamin
    roaddat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: roaddamis
    roaddat+V+TV+VAbess: råttak
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: råttav
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: råtta
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: roaddabihtit
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: roaddi
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: roaddiv
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: roaddi
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: råttaj
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: råttajma
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: råttajda
    roaddat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: råttajga
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: råtta
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: roaddis
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: roaddon
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: roadde
    roaddat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: roaddiska
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: roaddup
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: roaddut
    roaddat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: roaddusa
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: råttatjav
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: råttatja
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: råttasj
    roaddat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: råttatji
    roaddat+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: råttaduváv
    roaddat+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: roadduv
    roaddat+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: råttadaláv
    roaddat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: råttalulu
    roaddat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: råttalulujma
